Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 4. Actions and Claims

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

64A C.J.S. Municipal Corporations §§ 1935 to 1973.

§ 15-3-401.
Actions; when showing legal compliance required.

If any suit is instituted by or against any city under the law governing cities of the first class, in any of the courts of this state, the city is not required to show its compliance with the provisions thereof, as to its organization or the passage, adoption or publication of its ordinances, unless they are controverted by affidavit.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 192; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-192; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-3-402.
Actions; recovering penalty or fine; generally.

All actions brought to recover any penalty or fine shall be brought in the corporate name of the city and the recoveries, when collected, shall be paid into the city treasury. The process in every such action shall be a warrant, and the person named therein shall be arrested and taken before the municipal court for trial.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 193; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-193; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “municipal court” for “police justice.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

§ 15-3-403.
Actions; recovering penalty or fine; statement of complaining act.

In actions brought to recover a penalty or fine under any law pertaining to cities of the first class, it is not necessary to file with the affidavit or complaint a copy of the ordinances or bylaws or sections alleged to have been violated. It is sufficient to state in plain and concise language the act complained of and to recite in the affidavit or complaint the number of the section of the ordinance alleged to have been violated and the date of passage or adoption thereof.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 194; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-194; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-3-404.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 152, § 4.

Cross references. —

For present provisions as to the presentation and payment of claims, see §

15-1-125

.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 196, related to presentation of and actions upon claims against cities.